Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.150

License lapse—Reinstatement—Fee—Reexamination.

Any licensed funeral director or embalmer whose license has lapsed shall reapply for a license and pay a fee as determined under RCW 43.24.086 before the license may be issued. Applications under this section shall be made within one year after the expiration of the previous license. If the application is not made within one year, the applicant shall be required to take an examination and pay the license fee, which may include penalty fees.

[ 2005 c 365 s 11. Prior: 1986 c 259 s 63; 1985 c 7 s 41; 1981 c 43 s 10; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 45; 1937 c 108 s 8; RRS s 8320.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.